Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
C. Voting Agreements

§ 17-19-730.
Voting agreements.

Two (2) or more members may provide for the manner in which they will vote by signing an agreement for that purpose. Agreements under this section may be valid for a period of up to ten (10) years. For public benefit corporations such agreements shall have a reasonable purpose not inconsistent with the corporation’s public or charitable purposes.

A voting agreement created under this section is specifically enforceable.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.